Nevada, session 83, AB90.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 62B.505 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
62B.505 As used in NRS 62B.500 to 62B.530, inclusive,
“detention facility” includes a:
1. Local facility for the detention of children; [and]
2. State facility for the detention of children [.] ; and
3. Regional facility for the treatment and rehabilitation of
children.
Sec. 2. NRS 62E.505 is hereby amended to read as follows:
62E.505 Before the juvenile court commits a delinquent child
to the custody of a state facility for the detention of children [,] or to
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
the custody of a regional facility for the treatment and
rehabilitation of children, the court must find that:
1. Appropriate alternatives that could satisfactorily meet the
needs of the child do not exist in the community or were previously
used to attempt to meet such needs and proved unsuccessful; and
2. The child poses a public safety risk based on the child’s risk
of reoffending, as determined by a risk assessment conducted
pursuant to NRS 62E.506, any history of delinquency and the
seriousness of the offense committed by the child.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)